Texas statutes.
LOCAL GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 10. PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES

SUBTITLE C. PARKS AND OTHER RECREATIONAL AND CULTURAL RESOURCES PROVISIONS APPLYING TO MORE THAN ONE TYPE OF LOCAL GOVERNMENT

CHAPTER 333. JOINT MUNICIPAL-COUNTY MUSEUMS

Sec. 333.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the board of managers of a joint municipal and county museum.

(2) "Governing body" means a commissioners court of a county or a governing body of a municipality.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 333.002. JOINT MUSEUM. The governing bodies of a county with a population of 20,000 or less and a municipality that has a population of 10,000 or more and that is located within the county may jointly erect, equip, maintain, and operate a museum.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 333.003. FINANCES. The museum may be financed out of the general revenues of the municipality and county in agreed proportions.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 333.004. BOARD OF MANAGERS. By resolution or other proper action, the governing bodies may delegate to a board of managers full authority to erect, maintain, own, and equip a museum and to own, lease, or sublet realty for the museum.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 333.005. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The board must be composed of nine members, with four members appointed by each governing body and one appointed jointly by the governing bodies.

(b) Members serve for staggered terms of four years. In appointing the initial board, each governing body shall designate one appointee to serve for a one-year term, one to serve for a two-year term, one to serve for a three-year term, and one to serve for a four-year term. The member appointed jointly shall serve for a four-year term. Terms expire on the appropriate anniversary of the date of appointment.

(c) A vacancy occurring on the board by death or resignation shall be filled for the unexpired term by appointment of the governing body that appointed the vacating member or by joint appointment, as applicable.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 333.006. OFFICERS. (a) The board shall select from its membership a presiding officer. The presiding officer shall:

(1) preside over all board meetings; and

(2) sign all contracts, agreements, and other instruments executed by the board on behalf of the county and the municipality.

(b) The board may elect other officers from its membership as it considers necessary.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 333.007. CONTRACTS, GRANTS, AND EXPENDITURES. (a) The board may enter into any contract connected with or incident to the establishment, equipping, maintaining, and operating of the museum.

(b) The board may borrow and receive, exchange, sell, and lend property for the benefit of the museum.

(c) The board may accept on behalf of the municipality and county a gift or bequest. A gift or loan of property must be administered as designated by the donor.

(d) The board may pay and disburse funds set aside by the municipality and county for purposes connected with operating and maintaining the museum as if the action were taken by the governing bodies.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 333.008. FINANCIAL STATEMENT AND BUDGET. (a) Once each year the board shall prepare and present to the governing bodies a complete financial statement on the condition of the museum and shall submit to those bodies a proposed budget for the anticipated financial needs for the next year.

(b) On the basis of the financial statement and budget, the governing bodies shall appropriate and set aside for the use of the board the amount of money the bodies consider necessary for the operation of the museum.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.

Sec. 333.009. PERSONNEL. (a) The board may hire a manager of the museum. With the consent of the board, the manager may hire other personnel.

(b) The manager and other personnel are subject to the bylaws and rules adopted by the board.

Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 149, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987.